North Dakota statutes. TITLE 12.1 Criminal Code
CHAPTER 12.1-30 Sunday Closing Law

12.1-30-01.
Business or labor on Sunday — Exemptions — Classification of offenses. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 116, § 29; 1985, ch. 183, § 1; 1991, ch. 130, § 4; repealed by 2019, ch. 112, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

12.1-30-02.
Items prohibited from sale or rental on Sunday. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 116, § 29; 1979, ch. 112, § 3; 1985, ch. 183, § 2; 1991, ch. 130, § 5; repealed by 2019, ch. 112, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

12.1-30-03.
Businesses allowed to operate on Sunday — Limitations. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 116, § 29; 1979, ch. 112, § 4; 1983, ch. 169, § 1; 1985, ch. 183, § 3; 1987, ch. 100, § 3; 1989, ch. 171, § 1; 1991, ch. 131, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 63, § 5; 2001, ch. 460, § 1; 2017, ch. 104, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; repealed by 2019, ch. 112, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

12.1-30-04.
Retail business leases or agreements — Penalty.

A retail business may not be required to be open on Sunday as a part of a lease agreement, franchise agreement, or any other contractual arrangement entered and executed before January 1, 2019. A violation of this section is a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 130, § 6; 2019, ch. 112, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Cross-References.

Penalty for class A misdemeanor, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.